Washington statutes.
RCW 19.250.005

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Directory" or "directory form" means a categorized list or compilation of phone numbers, or a single phone number, in written, audio, electronic, digital, or any other format.

(2) "Directory provider" means any person in the business of marketing, selling, or sharing the phone number of any subscriber in directory form for commercial purposes.

(3) "Radio communications service company" has the same meaning as in RCW 80.04.010.

(4) "Reverse phone number search services" means a service that provides the name of a subscriber associated with a phone number when the phone number is supplied.

(5) "Subscriber" means a person who resides in the state of Washington and subscribes to radio communications services, radio paging, or cellular communications service with a Washington state area code.

(6) "Wireless phone number" means a phone number unique to the subscriber that permits the subscriber to receive radio communications, radio paging, or cellular communications from others.

[ 2009 c 401 s 1; 2008 c 271 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—2008 c 271: "The legislature finds that the right to privacy is a personal and fundamental right protected by Article I, section 7 of the state Constitution. The legislature also finds that, in the vast majority of cases, subscribers pay for both incoming and outgoing calls, and that subscribers purchase cell phone service with an expectation that their numbers will not be made public. Therefore, the legislature recognizes that a subscriber's cell phone number should be kept private, unless that subscriber knowingly provides their express, opt-in consent to have that number made available in a public directory." [ 2008 c 271 s 1.]